Missouri, session 2026, SB874.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.824, to read as
follows:
191.824. For the 2026-27 school year and all
subsequent school years, each public school, as such term is
defined in section 160.011, shall provide each student
enrolled in such public school with one free breakfast and
one free lunch each day such student attends classes in such
public school.
✓